Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-205
Enlistment; term; oath.

No person shall be enlisted for more than three years, but such enlistment may be renewed. The oath, to be taken upon enlistment in such forces, shall be substantially in the form prescribed for enlisted men of the National Guard, substituting the words Nebraska State Guard where necessary.

Laws 1941, c. 116, § 11, p. 450;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 55-411;

Laws 1943, c. 126, § 5, p. 429;

R.S.1943, § 55-205.